Hawaii statutes.
[§674-12] Immunity of panel members from
liability. No member of the panel shall be liable in damages for libel,
slander, or other defamation of character of any party to a panel proceeding
for any action taken or any opinion, conclusion, finding, or recommendation
made by a panel member while acting within the member's capacity as a member of
the panel under this chapter. [L 1991, c 323, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next